Idaho, session 2026, H0777.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 37-2705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2705. SCHEDULE I. (a) The controlled substances listed in this sec-
tion are included in schedule I.
(b) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically
excepted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts
is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-pip-
eridinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);
(2) Acetylmethadol;
(3) Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylac-
etamide);
(4) Acryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacry-
lamide);
(5) Allylprodine;


(6) Alphacetylmethadol (except levo-alphacetylmethadol also known as
levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate or LAAM);
(7) Alphameprodine;
(8) Alphamethadol;
(9) Alpha'-methyl butyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidi-
n-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide);
(10) Alpha-methylfentanyl;
(11) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(12) Benzethidine;
(13) Betacetylmethadol;
(14) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperid-
inyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(15) Beta-hydroxythiofentanyl;
(16) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-
methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
(17) Betameprodine;
(18) Betamethadol;
(19) Beta-methyl fentanyl;
(20) Beta-methylacetyl fentanyl;
(20) (21) Beta'-phenyl fentanyl;
(21) (22) Betaprodine;
(22) (23) Brorphine (1-(1-(1-(4-Bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-
1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[D]imidazol-2-one);
(23) (24) Butonitazene (2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1hbenzimida-
zol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine);
(24) (25) Clonitazene;
(25) (26) Crotonyl fentanyl ((E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylbut-2-enamide);
(26) (27) Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide);
(27) (28) Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide);
(28) (29) Dextromoramide;
(29) (30) Diampromide;
(30) (31) Diethylthiambutene;
(31) (32) Difenoxin;
(32) (33) Dimenoxadol;
(33) (34) Dimepheptanol;
(34) (35) 2',5'-Dimethoxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)pip-
eridin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide);
(35) (36) Dimethylthiambutene;
(36) (37) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(37) (38) Dipipanone;
(38) (39) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(39) (40) Etodesnitazene; (Etazene) (2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1hbenzim-
idazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine);
(40) (41) Etonitazene;
(41) (42) Etoxeridine;


(42) (43) Fentanyl-related substances. "Fentanyl-related substances"
means any substance not otherwise listed and for which no exemption or
approval is in effect under section 505 of the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. 355, and that is structurally related to fen-
tanyl by one (1) or more of the following modifications:
i. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any
monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocy-
cle;
ii. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl,
alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;
iii. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl,
alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino,
or nitro groups;
iv. Replacement Substitution in or on the aniline ring or replace-
ment of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle, whether or
not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; and/or
v. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group;
(43) (44) Fentanyl carabamate;
(44) (45) Flunitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1h-
benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(45) (46) 4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide);
(46) (47) 2'-fluoro ortho-fluorofentanyl;
(47) (48) Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyl-
furan-2-carboxamide);
(48) (49) 3-Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylfuran-3-carboxamide);
(49) (50) Furethidine;
(50) (51) Hydroxypethidine;
(51) (52) Isobutyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylisobutyramide);
(52) (53) Isovalery fentanyl (3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)-N-phenylbutanimide);
(53) (54) Isotonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4isopropoxybenzyl)-5-ni-
tro-1h-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(54) (55) Ketobemidone;
(55) (56) Levomoramide;
(56) (57) Levophenacylmorphan;
(57) (58) Meta-fluorofentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide);
(59) Meta-fluorofuranyl fentanyl;
(58) (60) Meta-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide);
(59) (61) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-
4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);
(60) (62) 2-Methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-
yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one);
(61) (63) 4'-methyl acetyl fentanyl;
(62) (64) 3-Methylfentanyl;


(63) (65) 3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide) (and optical and geometric isomers
of 3-methylthiofentanyl);
(64) (66) Metodesnitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1h-
benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(65) (67) Metonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-ni-
tro-1hbenzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(66) (68) Morpheridine;
(67) (69) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
(68) (70) MT-45 (1-cyclohexyl-4- (1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine);
(69) (71) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperdin-4-yl)Isobutyra-
mide (pPara-chloroisobutyrl fentanyl);
(70) (72) Noracymethadol;
(71) (73) Norlevorphanol;
(72) (74) Normethadone;
(73) (75) Norpipanone;
(76) N-desethyl isotonitazene;
(77) N-piperidinyl etonitazene;
(74) (78) N-pyrrolidino etonitazene (2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-ni-
tro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)1hbenzimidazole);
(75) (79) Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethyl-
piperidin-4-yl)acetamide);
(80) Ortho-chlorofentanyl;
(76) (81) Ortho-fluoroacryl fentanyl;
(77) (82) Ortho-fluorobutyrl fentanyl;
(78) (83) Ortho-fluorofentanyl;
(79) (84) Ortho-fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide);
(80) (85) Ortho-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl;
(81) (86) Ortho-methyl acetylfentanyl;
(87) Ortho-methylcyclopropylfentanyl;
(82) (88) Ortho-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl;
(89) Para-chlorofentanyl;
(83) (90) Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) isobutyramide);
(84) (91) Para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) butyramide);
(85) (92) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phen-
ethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);
(86) (93) Para-fluoro furanyl fentanyl;
(94) Para-fluoro valeryl fentanyl;
(87) (95) Para-methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) butyramide);
(88) (96) Para-methoxyfuranyl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide);
(89) (97) Para-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-
phenylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide);
(90) (98) Para-methylfentanyl;
(91) (99) PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
(92) (100) Phenadoxone;


(93) (101) Phenampromide;
(94) (102) Phenomorphan;
(95) (103) Phenoperidine;
(96) (104) Phenyl fentanyl;
(97) (105) Piritramide;
(98) (106) Proheptazine;
(99) (107) Properidine;
(100) (108) Propiram;
(101) (109) Protonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxyben-
zyl)-1h-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(102) (110) Racemoramide;
(103) (111) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperi-
dine-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide);
(112) Tetrahydrothiofuranyl fentanyl;
(104) (113) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piper-
idinyl]-propanamide);
(105) (114) Tilidine;
(106) (115) Trimeperidine;
(107) (116) u-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide);
(108) (117) Valeryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylpentanamide);
(109) (118) Zipeprol (1-methoxy-3-[4-(2-methoxy-2-phenylethyl)piper-
azin-1-yl]-1-phenylpropan-2-ol).
(c) Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and
salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
(1) Acetorphine;
(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(3) Benzylmorphine;
(4) Codeine methylbromide;
(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;
(6) Cyprenorphine;
(7) Desomorphine;
(8) Dihydromorphine;
(9) Drotebanol;
(10) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
(11) Heroin;
(12) Hydromorphinol;
(13) Methyldesorphine;
(14) Methyldihydromorphine;
(15) Morphine methylbromide;
(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;
(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;
(18) Myrophine;
(19) Nicocodeine;
(20) Nicomorphine;
(21) Normorphine;
(22) Pholcodine;


(23) Thebacon.
(d) Hallucinogenic substances. Any material, compound, mixture or
preparation that contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically
excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of iso-
mers is possible within the specific chemical designation (for purposes of
this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position and
geometric isomers):
(1) Dimethoxyphenethylamine, or any compound not specifically
excepted or listed in another schedule that can be formed from
dimethoxyphenethylamine by replacement of one (1) or more hydrogen
atoms with another atom(s), functional group(s) or substructure(s)
including, but not limited to, compounds such as DOB, DOC, 2C-B,
25B-NBOMe;
(2) Methoxyamphetamine or any compound not specifically excepted or
listed in another schedule that can be formed from methoxyamphetamine
by replacement of one (1) or more hydrogen atoms with another atom(s),
functional group(s) or substructure(s) including, but not limited to,
compounds such as PMA and DOM;
(3) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;
(4) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT);
(5) Amphetamine or methamphetamine with a halogen substitution on the
benzyl ring, including compounds such as fluorinated amphetamine and
fluorinated methamphetamine;
(6) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (MDA);
(7) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(8) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-et-
hyl-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and N-et-
hyl MDA, MDE, MDEA);
(9) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hyd-
roxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and N-hyd-
roxy MDA);
(10) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(11) 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 5-methoxy-3-2[2-
(dimethylamino)ethyl]indole and 5-MeO-DMT);
(12) Alpha-ethyltryptamine (some other names: etryptamine, 3-(2-am-
inobutyl) indole AET);
(13) Alpha-methyltryptamine (AMT);
(14) Bufotenine;
(15) Diethyltryptamine (DET);
(16) Dimethyltryptamine (DMT);
(17) Ibogaine;
(18) Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD);
(19) Marihuana (marijuana);
(20) Mescaline;
(21) Methoxetamine;
(22) Parahexyl;
(23) Peyote;
(24) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(25) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;


(26) Para-methoxymethamphetamine (PMMA), 1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-
methylpropan-2-amine;
(27) Psilocybin;
(28) Psilocyn;
(29) Tetrahydrocannabinols or synthetic equivalents of the substances
contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp.
and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with simi-
lar chemical structure such as the following:
i. Tetrahydrocannabinols, except for the permitted amount of
tetrahydrocannabinol found in industrial hemp, or nabiximols in a
drug product approved by the United States food and drug adminis-
tration:
a. ∆ 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their opti-
cal isomers, excluding dronabinol in sesame oil and encapsu-
lated in either a soft gelatin capsule or in an oral solution
in a drug product approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Adminis-
tration.
b. ∆ 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers.
c. ∆ 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers. (Since nomenclature of these substances is not in-
ternationally standardized, compounds of these structures,
regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions are
covered.)
d. [(6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2methy-
loctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-
1-o1)], also known as 6aR-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylhep-
tyl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydro-1-hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-6H-
dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-methanol (HU-210) and its geometric
isomers (HU211 or dexanabinol).
ii. The following synthetic drugs:
a. Any compound structurally derived from (1H-indole-3-
yl)(cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl)methanone, or (1H-in-
dole-3-yl)(cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl)methane, or
(1H-indole-3-yl)(cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl), methyl
or dimethyl butanoate, amino-methyl (or dimethyl)-1-oxobu-
tan-2-yl) carboxamide by substitution at the nitrogen atoms
of the indole ring or carboxamide to any extent, whether or
not further substituted in or on the indole ring to any ex-
tent, whether or not substituted to any extent in or on the
cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl ring(s) (substitution in the
ring may include, but is not limited to, heteroatoms such as
nitrogen, sulfur and oxygen).
b. N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluo-
ropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-AB-PINACA).
c. 1-(1.3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one
(N-ethylpentylone, (ephylone).
d. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 H-inda-
zole-3-carboxamide (4-cn-cumyl-BUTINACA).


e. 5-pentyl-2-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)pyrido[4,3-b]indol-1-
one (Cumyl PeGACLONE Pegaclone).
f. Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate * (5F-EDMB-PINACA).
g. Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-
3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-EDMB-PICA).
h. (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3tetram-
ethylcyclopropyl)methanone (FUB-144).
i. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-inda-
zole-3-carboxamide (5f-cumyl-pinaca; SGT-25).
j. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1
H-pyrrolo[2.3-B]pyridine-3-carboxamide(5fcumyl-P7AICA).
k. FUB-AMB, MMB- FUBINACA (Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluoroben-
zyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate.
l. MMB-FUBICA (Methyl 2-(1-(4-Fluorobenzyl)-1H-Indole-3-
carboxamido)-3-methyl butanoate).
m. Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-((1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-in-
dazole-3-yl)formamidocarboxamido)butanoate (MDMB-4EN-
PINACA).
n. Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3-methylbutanoate (MMB-CHMICA, AMB-CHMICA).
o. Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-CHMICA, MMB-CHMINACA).
p. Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxam-
ido-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-FUBINACA).
q. Methyl 2-[[1-(4-Fluorobutyl)Indole-3-Carbonyl]Amino]-
3,3-Dimethyl-Butanoate (4F-MDMB-BUTICA, 4F-MDMB-BICA).
r. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-MDMB-PICA, 5F-MDMB-2201).
s. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-ADB, 5F-MDMB-PINACA).
t. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3-methylbutanoate (5F-AMB).
u. N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-
Indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-BUTINACA).
v. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluo-
robenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-FUBINACA).
w. N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(pent-4-
en-1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-4EN-PINACA).
x. N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (FUB-AKB48; FUB-APINACA).
y. N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (5F-APINACA, 5F-AKB48).
z. N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)1-(Cyclohexyl-
methyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (AB-CHMINACA).
aa. Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-car-
boxylate (NM2201; CBL2201).
bb. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naph-
thoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not further sub-


stituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
cc. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthyl-
methyl)indene by substitution at the 3-position of the in-
dene ring to any extent, whether or not further substituted
in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
dd. Any compound structurally derived from 3-pheny-
lacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring to any extent, whether or not further substi-
tuted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not sub-
stituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.
ee. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxy-
cyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 5-position of the
phenolic ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in
the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
ff. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(benzoyl)in-
dole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of
the indole ring to any extent, whether or not further sub-
stituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.
gg. [2,3-dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinyl-
methyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-
napthalenylmethanone (WIN-55,212-2).
hh. 3-dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxyhexahydrocannabinol (HU-
243).
ii. [(6S, 6aR, 9R, 10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-methyl-3-[(2R)-
5-phenylpentan-2-yl]oxy-5,6,6a,7,8,9,10,10a-octahy-
drophenanthridin-1-yl]acetate (CP 50,5561).
(30) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: N-ethyl-1-phenylcy-
clohexylamine (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcy-
clohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;
(31) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: 1-(phenylcyclohexyl) -
pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
(32) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-
piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine, TPCP, TCP;
(33) Thiofuranyl fentanyl;
(34) (33) 1-[1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine another name:
TCPy;
(35) (34) Spores or mycelium capable of producing mushrooms that con-
tain psilocybin or psilocin.
(e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity
of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central ner-
vous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the
specific chemical designation:
(1) Bromazolam;
(1) (2) Clonazolam;
(2) (3) Diclazepam;


(3) (4) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (some other names include GHB; gam-
ma-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hyroxybutanoic acid; sod-
ium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);
(4) (5) Etizolam;
(5) (6) Flualprazolam;
(6) (7) Flubromazolam;
(7) (8) Flunitrazepam (also known as R2, Rohypnol);
(8) (9) Mecloqualone;
(9) (10) Methaqualone.
(f) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of iso-
mers:
(1) Amineptine (7-[(10,11-dihydro-5H-dibenzo[a,d]cyclohepten-5-
yl)amino]heptanoic acid);
(2) Aminorex (some other names: (aminoxaphen), 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-
oxazoline, or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine), 4,4'-dimethylam-
inorex (4,4'-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazo-
lamine) or (4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
(3) Cathinone (some other names: 2-amino-1-phenol-1-propanone, alp-
ha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone);
(4) Substituted cathinones. Any compound, except bupropion or com-
pounds listed under a different schedule, structurally derived from
2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either
phenyl, naphthyl or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound
is further modified in any of the following ways:
i. By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl,
alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl or halide sub-
stituents, whether or not further substituted in the ring system
by one (1) or more other univalent substituents;
ii. By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl sub-
stituent;
iii. By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl,
dialkyl, benzyl or methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the
2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.
(5) Alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone* (PV8);
(6) Alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone* (A-PHP);
(7) 4-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone* (4-chloro-a-pvp);
(8) Ethylphenidate;
(8) (9) Eutylone (1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)bu-
tan-1-one) (bk-EBDB);
(9) (10) Fenethylline;
(10) (11) Mesocarb (N-phenyl-N'-(3-(1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxa-
diazol-3-ium-5-yl)carbamimidate);
(11) (12) Methcathinone (some other names: 2-(methyl-amino)-pro-
piophenone, alpha-(methylamino)-propiophenone, N-methylcathin-
one, AL-464, AL-422, AL-463 and UR1423);
(12) (13) Methiopropamine (N-methyl-1-(thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-
amine);


(13) (14) (+/-)cis-4-methylaminorex [(+/-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-meth-
yl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine];
(14) (15) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone* (4-MEAP);
(15) (16) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone* (MPHP);
(16) (17) 2-(methylamino)-1-(3-methylphenyl)propan-1-one (3-MMC);
(17) (18) 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidine-1-yl)pent-1-one) (ALPHA-
PIHP);
(18) (19) N-benzylpiperazine (also known as: BZP, 1-benzylpiper-
azine);
(19) (20) N-ethylamphetamine;
(20) (21) N-ethylhexedrone*;
(21) (22) N,N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as: N,N-alpha-
trimethyl-benzeneethanamine).
SECTION 2. That Section 37-2707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2707. SCHEDULE II. (a) Schedule II shall consist of the drugs and
other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical
name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
(b) Substances, vegetable origin or chemical synthesis. Unless
specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the fol-
lowing substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction
from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical
synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or prepa-
ration of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, dextrorphan, nal-
buphine, naldemedine, nalmefene, naloxegol, 6β-naltexol, naloxone,
naltrexone, samidorphan, and their respective salts, but including the
following:
1. i. Raw opium;
2. ii. Opium extracts;
3. iii. Opium fluid extracts;
4. iv. Powdered opium;
5. v. Granulated opium;
6. vi. Tincture of opium;
7. vii. Codeine;
8. viii. Dihydroetorphine;
9. ix. Diprenorphine;
10. x. Ethylmorphine;
11. xi. Etorphine hydrochloride;
12. xii. Hydrocodone;
13. xiii. Hydromorphone;
14. xiv. Metopon;
15. xv. Morphine;
xvi. Noroxymorphone;
16. xvii. Oripavine;
17. xviii. Oxycodone;
18. xix. Oxymorphone;
19. Tapentadol;
20. xx. Thebaine.


(2) Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is
chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred
to in paragraph (1) of this subsection, except that these substances
shall not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(3) Opium poppy and poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these
substances, but shall not include the following:
1. i. Decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves,
which extractions do not contain cocaine; or ecgonine; or
2. ii. [123I]ioflupane.
(5) Benzoylecgonine.
(6) Methylbenzoylecgonine (Cocaine, - its salts, optical and geometric
isomers, and salts of optical and geometric isomers).
(7) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in liq-
uid, solid or powder form that contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of
the opium poppy).
(c) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these iso-
mers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule:
(1) Alfentanil;
(2) Alphaprodine;
(3) Anileridine;
(4) Bezitramide;
(5) Bulk Dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms);
(6) Carfentanil;
(7) Dihydrocodeine;
(8) Diphenoxylate;
(9) Fentanyl;
(10) Isomethadone;
(11) Levo-alphacetylmethadol (also known as levo-alpha-acetylmet-
hadol, levomethadyl acetate, LAAM);
(12) Levomethorphan;
(13) Levorphanol;
(14) Metazocine;
(15) Methadone;
(16) Methadone -- Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl
butane;
(17) Moramide -- Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenyl
propane-carboxylic acid;
(18) Norfentanyl (N-phenyl-N-(piperidin-4-yl) propionamide);
(19) (18) Oliceridine;
(20) (19) Pethidine (meperidine);
(21) (20) Pethidine -- Intermediate -- A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenyl-
piperidine;
(22) (21) Pethidine -- Intermediate -- B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperid-
ine-4-carboxylate;


(23) (22) Pethidine -- Intermediate -- C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperid-
ine-4-carboxylic acid;
(24) (23) Phenazocine;
(25) (24) Piminodine;
(26) (25) Racemethorphan;
(27) (26) Racemorphan;
(28) (27) Remifentanil;
(29) (28) Sufentanil.;
(29) Tapentadol;
(30) Thiafentanil.
(d) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on
the central nervous system:
(1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical
isomers;
(2) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
(3) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
(4) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
(5) Methylphenidate.
(e) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of iso-
mers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Amobarbital;
(2) Glutethimide;
(3) Pentobarbital;
(4) Phencyclidine;
(5) Secobarbital.
(f) Hallucinogenic substances.
(1) Nabilone ............................ (another name for nabilone:
(+/-)-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a-hexahydro-1-hy-
droxy-6,6-dimethyl-9H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-one) (21 CFR 1308.12 (f)).
(g) Immediate precursors. Unless specifically excepted or unless
listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of the following substances:
(1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine:
(a) i. Anthranilic acid;
(b) ii. Ephedrine;
(c) iii. Lead acetate;
(d) iv. Methylamine;
(e) v. Methyl formamide;
(f) vi. N-methylephedrine;
(g) vii. Phenylacetic acid;
(h) viii. Phenylacetone (phenyl-2-propanone, P2P);
(i) ix. Phenylpropanolamine;
(j) x. Pseudoephedrine.


Except that any combination or compound containing ephedrine, or any of
its salts and isomers, or phenylpropanolamine or its salts and isomers,
or pseudoephedrine, or any of its salts and isomers which is prepared
for dispensing or over-the-counter distribution is not a controlled
substance for the purpose of this section, unless such substance is pos-
sessed, delivered, or possessed with intent to deliver to another with
the intent to manufacture methamphetamine, amphetamine or any other
controlled substance in violation of section 37-2732, Idaho Code. For
purposes of this provision, the requirements of the uniform controlled
substances act shall not apply to a manufacturer, wholesaler or re-
tailer of over-the-counter products containing the listed substances
unless such person possesses, delivers, or possesses with intent to
deliver to another the over-the-counter product with intent to manufac-
ture a controlled substance.
(2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
(a) i. 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;
(b) ii. 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).
(3) Immediate precursors to fentanyl:
i. 4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP).;
ii. Norfentanyl.
SECTION 3. That Section 37-2709, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2709. SCHEDULE III. (a) Schedule III shall consist of the drugs and
other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical
name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
(b) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, (whether optical,
positional, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence
of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
(1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form con-
taining any stimulant substances listed in schedule II which compounds,
mixtures, or preparations were listed as excepted compounds under 21
CFR 1308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative composition shown in
that list for those drugs or which is the same except that it contains a
lesser quantity of controlled substances.
(2) Benzphetamine;
(3) Chlorphentermine;
(4) Clortermine;
(5) Phendimetrazine.
(c) Depressants. Unless listed in another schedule, any material, com-
pound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
substances having a potential for abuse associated with a depressant effect
on the central nervous system:
(1) Any compound, mixture or preparation containing the following sub-
stances or any salt thereof and one (1) or more other active medicinal
ingredients that are not listed in any schedule:


i. Amobarbital;
ii. Secobarbital;
iii. Pentobarbital or any salt thereof and one (1) or more other
active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule.
(2) Any suppository dosage form containing the following substances or
any salt of any of these drugs and approved by the food and drug adminis-
tration for marketing only as a suppository:
i. Amobarbital;
ii. Secobarbital;
iii. Pentobarbital or any salt of any of these drugs and approved
by the Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppos-
itory.
(3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbi-
turic acid or any salt thereof, including, but not limited to:
i. Aprobarbital;
ii. Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);
iii. Butalbital, excluding drug products exempted by the federal
drug enforcement administration (DEA);
iv. Butobarbital (butethal);
v. Talbutal;
vi. Thiamylal;
vii. Thiopental;
viii. Vinbarbital.
(4) Chlorhexadol;
(5) Embutramide;
(6) Any drug product containing gamma hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), in-
cluding its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an applica-
tion is approved under section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cos-
metic act;
(7) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers-
7285. (Some other names for ketamine: (+/-)-2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-
(methylamino)-cyclohexanone).
(8) Lysergic acid;
(9) Lysergic acid amide (LSA, LAA);
(10) Methyprylon;
(11) Perampanel, and its salts, isomers and salts of isomers;
(12) Sulfondiethylmethane;
(13) Sulfonethylmethane;
(14) Sulfonmethane;
(15) Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof.
(d) Nalorphine.
(e) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule:
(1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited
quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or any salts thereof:
(i) i. Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, or any of its salts,
per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit,
with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of
opium;


(ii) ii. Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, or any of its salts,
per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit,
with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;
(iii) iii. Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine, or any of
its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per
dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients
in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(iv) iv. Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine, or any of
its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per
dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients
in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(v) v. Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters
or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit,
with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;
(vi) vi. Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine, or any of its
salts, per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams with one (1) or more ac-
tive, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.
(2) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of
the following narcotic drugs or their salts, as set forth below:
(i) i. Buprenorphine.
(ii) ii. [Reserved].
(f) Anabolic steroids and human growth hormones. Any drug or hormonal
substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other
than estrogens, progestins and corticosteroids) that promotes muscle growth
including any salt, ester or isomer of a drug or substance listed in this sub-
section, if that salt, ester or isomer promotes muscle growth.
(1) 13beta-ethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
(2) 17alpha-methyl-3alpha, 17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;
(3) 17alpha-methyl-3beta, 17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;
(4) 17alpha-methyl-3beta, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;
(5) 17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone;
(6) 17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-17beta-ol;
(7) 17alpha-methyl-androst-2-ene-3,17beta-diol;
(8) 17alpha-methyl-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17beta-diol;
(9) 17alpha-methyl-androstan-3-hydroxyimine-17beta-ol;
(10) 17alpha-methyl-delta1-dihydrotestosterone;
(11) 17beta-hydroxy-androstano[2,3 3,2-c]isoxazole;
(12) 17beta-hydroxy-androstano[2,3-d]isoxazole;
(13) 18alpha-homo-3-hydroxy-estra-2,5(10)-dien-17-one;
(14) 19-nor-4-androstenediol;
(15) 19-nor-4-androstenedione;
(16) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione;
(17) 19-nor-5-androstenediol;
(18) 19-nor-5-androstenedione;
(19) 1-androstenediol;
(20) 1-androstenedione;
(21) 2alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxy-5beta-androstan-3-one;


(22) 2alpha,3alpha-epithio-17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-17beta-
ol;
(23) [3,2-c]furazan-5alpha-androstan-17beta-ol;
(24) [3,2-c]pyrazole-androst-4-en-17beta-ol;
(25) 3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;
(26) 3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;
(27) 3beta-hydroxy-estra-4,9,11-trien-17-one;
(28) 4-androstenediol;
(29) 4-androstenedione;
(30) 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17beta-diol;
(31) 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-androst-4-ene-3beta,17beta-diol;
(32) 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one;
(33) 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,11-
dione;
(34) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone;
(35) 4-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione;
(36) 4-hydroxytestosterone;
(37) 5alpha-androstan-3,17-dione;
(38) 5alpha-androstan-3,6,17-trione;
(39) 5-androstenediol;
(40) 5-androstenedione;
(41) 6alpha-methyl-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione;
(42) 6-bromo-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione;
(43) 6-bromo-androstan-3,17-dione;
(44) Androstenedione;
(45) Bolasterone;
(46) Boldenone;
(47) Boldione;
(48) Calusterone;
(49) Chlorotestosterone (4-chlorotestosterone);
(50) Clostebol;
(51) Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone;
(52) Delta1-dihydrotestosterone (1-testosterone);
(53) Desoxymethyltestosterone (madol);
(54) Dihydrotestosterone (4-dihydrotestosterone);
(55) Drostanolone;
(56) Estra-4,9,11-triene-3,17-dione;
(57) Ethylestrenol;
(58) Fluoxymesterone;
(59) Formebulone Formebolone;
(60) Furazabol;
(61) Human growth hormones;
(62) Mestanolone;
(63) Mesterolone;
(64) Methandienone;
(65) Methandranone;
(66) Methandriol;
(67) Methandrostenolone;
(68) Methasterone (2a, 17a-dimethyl-5a-androstan-17β-ol-3-one);
(69) Methenolone;


(70) Methyldienolone;
(71) Methyltestosterone;
(72) Methyltrienolone;
(73) Mibolerone;
(74) Nandrolone;
(75) Norbolethone;
(76) Norclostebol;
(77) Norethandrolone;
(78) Normethandrolone;
(79) Oxandrolone;
(80) Oxymesterone;
(81) Oxymetholone;
(82) Prostanozol (17β-hydroxy-5a-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole);
(83) Stanolone;
(84) Stanozolol;
(85) Stenbolone;
(86) Testolactone;
(87) Testosterone;
(88) Testosterone cypionate;
(89) Testosterone enanthate;
(90) Testosterone propionate;
(91) Tetrahydrogestrinone;
(92) Trenbolone.
Anabolic steroids that are expressly intended for administration
through implants or injection to cattle or other nonhuman species, and that
are approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for such use, shall
not be classified as controlled substances under this act and shall not be
governed by its provisions.
In addition to the penalties prescribed in article IV of the uniform
controlled substances act, any person shall be guilty of a felony who pre-
scribes, dispenses, supplies, sells, delivers, manufactures or possesses
with the intent to prescribe, dispense, supply, sell, deliver or manufac-
ture anabolic steroids or any other human growth hormone for purposes of
enhancing performance in an exercise, sport or game or hormonal manipulation
intended to increase muscle mass, strength or weight without a medical ne-
cessity as determined by a physician.
(g) Hallucinogenic substances.
(1) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft
gelatin capsule in the federal Food and Drug Administration ap-
proved product -- 7369. (Some other names for dronabinol: (6aR-
trans) -6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo
[b,d]pyran-1-ol or (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol).
(h) The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in subsection (b)
or (c) of this section from the application of all or any part of this act if
the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or more active medic-
inal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central
nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations,
quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse


of the substances which have a stimulant or depressant effect on the central
nervous system.
SECTION 4. That Section 37-2711, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2711. SCHEDULE IV. (a) Schedule IV shall consist of the drugs and
other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical
name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
(b) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation contain-
ing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the
free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:
(1) No more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micro-
grams of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
(2) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl-
3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane);
(3) 2- [(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol (in-
cluding tramadol) Tramadol, including its salts, optical and geometric
isomers, and salts of isomers.
(c) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, iso-
mers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Alfaxalone 5[alpha]-pregnan-3[alpha]-ol-11,20-dione;
(2) Alprazolam;
(3) Barbital;
(4) Brexanolone (allopregnanolone);
(4) (5) Bromazepam;
(5) (6) Camazepam;
(6) (7) Carisoprodol;
(7) (8) Chloral betaine;
(8) (9) Chloral hydrate;
(9) (10) Chlordiazepoxide;
(10) (11) Clobazam;
(11) (12) Clonazepam;
(12) (13) Clorazepate;
(13) (14) Clotiazepam;
(14) (15) Cloxazolam;
(15) (16) Daridorexant;
(16) (17) Delorazepam;
(17) (18) Diazepam;
(18) (19) Dichloralphenazone;
(19) (20) Estazolam;
(20) (21) Ethchlorvynol;
(21) (22) Ethinamate;
(22) (23) Ethyl loflazepate;
(23) (24) Fludiazepam;
(24) (25) Flurazepam;
(25) (26) Fospropofol;


(26) (27) Halazepam;
(27) (28) Haloxazolam;
(28) (29) Ketazolam;
(29) (30) Lemborexant;
(30) (31) Loprazolam;
(31) (32) Lorazepam;
(32) (33) Lormetazepam;
(33) (34) Mebutamate;
(34) (35) Medazepam;
(35) (36) Meprobamate;
(36) (37) Methohexital;
(37) (38) Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
(38) (39) Midazolam;
(39) (40) Nimetazepam;
(40) (41) Nitrazepam;
(41) (42) Nordiazepam;
(42) (43) Oxazepam;
(43) (44) Oxazolam;
(44) (45) Paraldehyde;
(45) (46) Petrichloral;
(46) (47) Phenobarbital;
(47) (48) Pinazepam;
(48) (49) Prazepam;
(49) (50) Quazepam;
(50) (51) Remimazolam;
(51) Serdexmethylpheniate;
(52) Suvorexant;
(53) Temazepam;
(54) Tetrazepam;
(55) Triazolam;
(56) Zaleplon;
(57) Zolpidem;
(58) Zopiclone;
(59) Zuranolone.
(d) Fenfluramine -- Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its
salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such
isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
is possible:
(1) Dexfenfluramine;
(2) Fenfluramine.
(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical,
position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence
of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
(1) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
(2) Diethylpropion;


(3) Fencamfamin;
(4) Fenproporex;
(5) Lorcaserin;
(6) Mazindol;
(7) Mefenorex;
(8) Modafinil;
(9) Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates
thereof);
(10) Phentermine;
(11) Pipradrol;
(12) Serdexmethylpheniate;
(12) (13) Sibutramine;
(13) (14) SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
(14) (15) Solriamfetol(2-amino-3-phenylpropyl carbamata; benzene-
propanol, beta-amino-, carbamate(ester)).
(f) Other substances. Unless specifically excepted, or unless listed
in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:
(1) Brexanolone (3A-hydroxy-5A-pregnan-20-one), allopregnanolone;
(2) (1) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);
(3) (2) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-
dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-
yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid) (including its optical
isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers);
(4) (3) Pentazocine.
(g) The board may except, by rule, any compound, mixture, or prepara-
tion containing any depressant substance listed in subsection (c) of this
section from the application of all or any part of this act if the compound,
mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or more active medicinal ingredi-
ents not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or
concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which
have a depressant effect on the central nervous system.
SECTION 5. That Section 37-2713, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2713. SCHEDULE V. (a) Schedule V shall consist of the drugs and
other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical
name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
(b) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation contain-
ing any of the following narcotic drugs and their salts, as set forth below.
(c) Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredi-
ents. Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the follow-
ing limited quantities of narcotic drugs or salts thereof, which shall in-
clude one (1) or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient
proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation, valuable
medicinal qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
(1) Not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per
100 grams;


(2) Not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters
or per 100 grams;
(3) Not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters
or per 100 grams;
(4) Not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25
micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
(5) Not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100
grams;
(6) Not more than 0.5 milligrams difenoxin and not less than 25 micro-
grams of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.
(d) Other substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed
in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:
(1) Brivaracetam ((2S)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]bu-
tanamide) (also referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact) (including its
salts);
(2) Cenobamate[(1R)-1-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl]car-
bamate;
(3) Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4-(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic
acid ethyl ester]-2779;
(4) Ganaxolone (3-alpha-hydroxy-3-beta-methyl-5-alpha-preg-
nan-20-one);
(5) Lacosamide;
(6) Lasmiditan [2,4,6-trifluoro-N-(6-(1-methylpiperidine-4-car-
bonyl)pyridine-2-yl)benzamide];
(7) Pregabalin;
(8) Pyrovalerone.
SECTION 6. That Section 37-2716, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2716. REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) Every person who manufac-
tures, distributes, prescribes, administers, or conducts research with any
controlled substance within this state shall obtain annually biennially a
registration issued by the board in accordance with Idaho law. All drug out-
lets with a valid license or registration under chapter 17, title 54, Idaho
Code, are exempt from obtaining a separate controlled substance registra-
tion.
(b) Every dispenser and prescriber, except veterinarians, shall also
register with the division to obtain online access to the controlled sub-
stances prescriptions database.
(c) Persons registered by the board under this chapter may possess,
manufacture, distribute, dispense, prescribe, administer, or conduct re-
search with those substances to the extent authorized by their registration
and licensing entity and in conformity with the other provisions of this
chapter.
(d) The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess
controlled substances under this chapter:
(1) An agent or employee of any person registered pursuant to this chap-
ter, if he is acting in the usual course of his business or employment;


(2) A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an employee
thereof, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual
course of business or employment;
(3) An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled sub-
stance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful posses-
sion of a schedule V substance.
(e) A separate registration is required at each principal place of
business or professional practice where the applicant manufactures, dis-
tributes, administers, dispenses, or conducts research with controlled
substances, except a separate registration is not required under this chap-
ter for practitioners engaging in research with nonnarcotic controlled
substances in schedules II through IV where the practitioner is already reg-
istered under this chapter in another capacity.
(f) Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research
with schedule I substances may conduct research with schedule I substances
within this state upon registering in Idaho and furnishing the board with
evidence of the practitioner's federal registration.
(g) The board may inspect the establishment of a registrant or appli-
cant for registration in accordance with Idaho law.
SECTION 7. That Section 37-2717, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2717. REGISTRATION. The board shall register an applicant to man-
ufacture, prescribe, administer, dispense, distribute or conduct research
with controlled substances included in sections 37-2705, 37-2707, 37-2709,
37-2711 and 37-2713, Idaho Code, unless it determines that the issuance of
that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In deter-
mining the public interest, the board shall consider the following factors:
(a) Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled
substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial
channels;
(b) Compliance with applicable state and local law;
(c) Any convictions of the applicant under any federal and state laws
relating to any controlled substance;
(d) Past experience Experience in the manufacture, dispensing,
prescribing, administering, research or distribution of controlled sub-
stances, and the existence in the applicant's establishment of effective
controls against diversions;
(e) Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any
application filed under this chapter;
(f) Restriction, suspension or revocation of the applicant's federal
registration; and
(g) Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public health
and safety.
SECTION 8. That Section 37-2718, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


37-2718. DISCIPLINE. (a) A registration under section 37-2717, Idaho
Code, may be restricted, suspended or revoked by the board upon a finding
that the registrant:
(1) Has furnished false or fraudulent material information in any ap-
plication filed under this act;
(2) Has been found guilty of a felony or misdemeanor under any state or
federal law relating to any controlled substance;
(3) Has had his federal registration restricted, suspended or revoked;
or
(4) Has violated this chapter, any rule of the board promulgated un-
der this act, an order of the board or any federal regulation relating to
controlled substances; provided, however, that no restriction, revoca-
tion or suspension procedure be initiated under this paragraph without
the board first giving notice of the procedure to the state licensing
board with authority over the registrant's professional license.
(b) The notice required in subsection (a)(4) of this section shall be
given immediately in the event action is taken without an order to show cause
as allowed under section 37-2719(b), Idaho Code. In all other cases, such
notice shall be given as early as reasonably practicable without risking
compromise of the board's investigation but no later than the earlier of:
(1) Issuance of an order to show cause under section 37-2719(a), Idaho
Code; or
(2) Setting of a hearing for approval of a resolution of the matter
through informal proceedings.
(c) Restriction, revocation or suspension procedures arising solely
from "practice-related issues" shall be referred by the board to such regis-
trant's state licensing board.
(1) Upon such referral, the registrant's state licensing board shall
commence such investigation of the referred matter as it deems neces-
sary and shall take action upon the registrant's license or shall inform
the board of pharmacy, in writing, that it has investigated the referred
matter and has concluded that no action is necessary.
(2) For purposes of this section, the term "practice-related issues"
refers to issues involving questions regarding the professional con-
duct of the registrant within the scope of the registrant's profession.
(d) The board may limit the revocation or suspension of a registration
to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for re-
vocation or suspension exist.
(e) If the board restricts, suspends or revokes a registration, all
pertinent controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant at the
time of the restriction or suspension or the effective date of the revocation
order may shall be placed under seal. No disposition may be made of sub-
stances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until
all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application therefor,
orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of
the sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all con-
trolled substances may be forfeited to the state for transfer to a reverse
distributor.
(f) The board shall promptly notify the bureau and the state licensing
board with authority over the registrant's professional license of all or-


ders restricting, suspending or revoking registration and all forfeitures
of controlled substances.
(g) In the event the drug enforcement administration or a state li-
censing board with authority over a registrant's professional license or
registration takes an action against the registrant in any fashion which
suspends, restricts, limits or affects the registrant's ability to manufac-
ture, distribute, prescribe, administer, dispense, or conduct research with
any controlled substance, the professional licensing board shall promptly
notify the board of pharmacy of the action.
(1) Upon such action, the board of pharmacy shall be authorized to issue
its order suspending, restricting, limiting or otherwise affecting the
registrant's controlled substance registration in the same fashion as
the professional licensing board action.
(2) The board of pharmacy order may be issued without further hearing or
proceeding, but shall be subject to the effect of any reversal or modi-
fication of the professional licensing board action by reason of any ap-
peal or rehearing.
SECTION 9. That Section 37-2719, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2719. ORDER TO SHOW CAUSE. (a) Except as set forth in section
37-2718(g), Idaho Code, before denying, restricting, suspending or revoking
a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration, the board shall serve
upon the applicant or registrant an order to show cause why the registration
should not be restricted, denied, revoked, or suspended, or why the renewal
should not be refused. The order to show cause shall contain a statement
of the basis therefor for discipline and shall call upon the applicant or
registrant to appear before the board at a time and place not less than thirty
(30) days after the date of service of the order, but in the case of a an
anticipated denial or of renewal of registration the show cause order shall
be served not later than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the reg-
istration. These proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, without regard to any criminal prosecution or other
proceeding. Proceedings to refuse renewal of registration shall not abate
the existing registration which shall remain in effect pending the outcome
of the administrative hearing.
(b) The board may suspend, without an order to show cause, any regis-
tration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under section
37-2718, Idaho Code, or where renewal of registration is refused, if it finds
that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety which war-
rants this action. The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclu-
sion of the proceedings, including judicial review thereof, unless sooner
withdrawn by the board or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) In conjunction with a proceeding for denying, restricting, sus-
pending or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration,
and upon a finding of grounds for such denial, restriction, suspension,
revocation or refusal to renew, the board may also impose an a reasonable ad-
ministrative fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) per occurrence
and additionally may include forfeiture of illicit profits and the costs of


prosecution and administrative costs of bringing the action including, but
not limited to, attorney's fees and costs and costs of hearing transcripts.
SECTION 10. That Section 37-2720, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2720. RECORDS -- DRUG STORAGE -- INVENTORY. Persons registered un-
der this chapter shall keep records, store controlled substances and main-
tain inventories in conformance with the recordkeeping, storage and inven-
tory requirements of state and federal law and with any additional rules the
board issues.
SECTION 11. That Section 37-2722, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2722. ISSUING, DISTRIBUTING, AND DISPENSING OF CONTROLLED SUB-
STANCES. No person shall issue or dispense a prescription drug order for a
controlled substance unless it is in compliance with applicable state and
federal law and rules of the board.
(a) Controlled substances included in schedule I shall be distributed
only by a registrant to another registrant pursuant to the federal drug en-
forcement administration (DEA) order form 222.
(b) Controlled substances included in schedule II shall:
(1) Be distributed only by a registrant to another registrant pursuant
to DEA order form 222.
(2) Be dispensed only pursuant to a valid prescription drug order, ex-
cept when dispensed directly by a prescriber.
(3) Not be refilled.
(4) Include a quantity that is both spelled out in English and written
in numerical form, when a written prescription drug order is required.
(c) Controlled substances included in schedule III or IV shall:
(1) Be dispensed only pursuant to a valid prescription drug order, ex-
cept when dispensed directly by a prescriber.
(2) Not be filled or refilled more than six (6) months after the date
thereof or be refilled more than five (5) times, unless renewed by the
practitioner.
(d) Controlled substances included in schedule V shall not be dis-
tributed or dispensed other than for a medical purpose.
(e) A pharmacist may dispense a controlled substance pursuant to a
valid prescription drug order of an individual licensed in a jurisdiction
other than the state of Idaho as long as the individual is acting within the
jurisdiction, scope and authority of his license.
(f) Prior to issuing to a patient a prescription for outpatient use
for an opioid analgesic or benzodiazepine listed in schedule II, III, or
IV, the prescriber or the prescriber's delegate shall review the patient's
prescription drug history for the preceding twelve (12) months from the pre-
scription drug monitoring program and evaluate the data for indicators of
prescription drug diversion or misuse. This review is not required:
(1) For patients:
(i) i. Receiving treatment in an inpatient setting;
(ii) ii. At the scene of an emergency or in an ambulance;


(iii) iii. In hospice care; or
(iv) iv. In a skilled nursing home care facility; or
(2) For a prescription in a quantity intended to last no more than three
(3) days.
(g) Subsection (f) of this section shall be effective on and after Octo-
ber 1, 2020, and shall apply only to individuals required by this chapter to
register for the prescription drug monitoring program.
SECTION 12. That Section 37-2726, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2726. FILING PRESCRIPTIONS -- DATABASE. (1) All controlled sub-
stances and opioid antagonists as defined in section 54-1704, Idaho Code,
dispensed for humans shall be filed with the division electronically in a
format established by the division. The division may require the filing of
other prescriptions by law or rule. The division shall establish the in-
formation to be submitted pursuant to the purposes of this section and the
purposes set forth in section 37-2730A, Idaho Code.
(2) The division shall create, operate and maintain a controlled
substances prescriptions database containing the information submitted
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to be used for the purposes
and subject to the terms, conditions and immunities described in section
37-2730A, Idaho Code. The division shall retain the information submitted
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for a period of five (5) years from
the date the controlled substance was dispensed. The database information
must may be made available only to the following:
(a) Authorized individuals employed by the division, Idaho's boards,
or other states' licensing entities charged with the licensing and dis-
cipline of practitioners;
(b) Peace officers and investigators employed by federal, state and lo-
cal law enforcement agencies engaged as a specified duty of their em-
ployment in enforcing law regulating controlled substances;
(c) Authorized individuals under the direction of the department of
health and welfare for the purpose of monitoring and enforcing that
department's responsibilities under the public health, medicare and
medicaid laws;
(d) A practitioner, licensed in Idaho or another state, having author-
ity to prescribe controlled substances, or a delegate under the prac-
titioner's supervision, to the extent the information relates specifi-
cally to a current patient of the practitioner to whom the practitioner
is prescribing or considering prescribing any controlled substance;
(e) A pharmacist, licensed in Idaho or another state, having author-
ity to dispense controlled substances, or a delegate under the pharma-
cist's supervision, to the extent the information relates specifically
to a current patient to whom that pharmacist is dispensing or consid-
ering dispensing any controlled substance, or providing pharmaceutical
care as defined in the Idaho pharmacy act;
(f) An individual who is the recipient of a dispensed controlled sub-
stance entered into the database may access records that pertain to that
individual, upon the production of positive identification, or that in-
dividual's designee upon production of a notarized release of informa-


tion by that individual that is notarized or otherwise certified pur-
suant to section 9-1406, Idaho Code;
(g) Upon a lawful order issued by the presiding judge in a court of com-
petent jurisdiction for the release of prescription monitoring program
records of a named individual;
(h) Prosecuting attorneys, deputy prosecuting attorneys, and special
prosecutors of a county or city employed by federal, state, county, or
local agencies and special assistant attorneys general from the office
of the attorney general engaged in enforcing law regulating controlled
substances; and
(i) A medical examiner or coroner who is an officer of or employed by a
state or local government, for determining a cause of death or for per-
forming other duties authorized by law.
(3) The division shall require pharmacists and prescribers, except
veterinarians, to register with the division to obtain online access to the
controlled substances prescriptions database.
(4) (3) The division must maintain records on the information disclosed
from the database, including:
(a) The identification of each individual who requests or receives in-
formation from the database and who that individual represents;
(b) The information provided to each such individual; and
(c) The date and time the information is requested or provided.
(5) (4) The division shall ensure that only authorized individuals have
access to the database.
(6) (5)(a) Any person who knowingly misrepresents to the division that
he is a person entitled under subsection (2) of this section to receive
information from the controlled substances prescriptions database un-
der the conditions therein provided, and who receives information from
the controlled substances prescriptions database resulting from that
misrepresentation, A person is guilty of a misdemeanor if such person:
(i) Knowingly misrepresents to the division that he is a person
entitled to receive information from the controlled substances
prescriptions database pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
and receives information from the controlled substances prescrip-
tions database as a result of such misrepresentation;
(ii) Knowingly discloses information obtained from the con-
trolled substances prescriptions database that identifies an in-
dividual patient to a person not authorized to receive or use such
information under any state or federal law, rule, or regulation,
without the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or
without written authorization. The provisions of this subpara-
graph shall not apply to disclosure of individual patient infor-
mation by the patient himself or disclosure of individual patient
information by a federal, state, or local prosecuting attorney,
a deputy prosecuting attorney or special prosecutor, or a special
assistant attorney general from the office of the attorney general
in the course of a criminal proceeding, whether preconviction or
post-conviction; or
(iii) Intentionally shares or recklessly fails to safeguard a
division-issued user account, login name, or password, result-


ing in another person obtaining information from the controlled
substances prescriptions database when such other person is not
authorized to receive or use such information under the provisions
of any state or federal law, rule, or regulation.
(b) Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a) of this sub-
section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in
a county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine not to exceed
two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both. The foregoing criminal penalty
is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative
penalty or sanction authorized by law.
(7) Any person in possession, whether lawfully or unlawfully, of infor-
mation from the controlled substances prescriptions database that identi-
fies an individual patient and who knowingly discloses such information to a
person not authorized to receive or use such information under any state or
federal law or rule or regulation, or the lawful order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, or without written authorization of the individual patient
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail
not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars
($2,000), or both. The foregoing criminal penalty is in addition to, and not
in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or sanction authorized
by law. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to disclosure of
individual patient information by the patient himself. The provisions of
this subsection shall not apply to disclosure of information by a prosecut-
ing attorney, deputy prosecuting attorney or special prosecutor of a county
or city or by a special assistant attorney general from the office of the at-
torney general in the course of a criminal proceeding, whether preconviction
or postconviction.
(8) Any person with access to the division's online prescription mon-
itoring program pursuant to a division-issued user account, login name and
password who intentionally shares or recklessly fails to safeguard his user
account, login name and password, resulting in another person not authorized
to receive or use such information under the provisions of any state or fed-
eral law, rule or regulation obtaining information from the controlled sub-
stances prescriptions database, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punish-
able by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six (6) months or by a fine
not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both. The foregoing criminal
penalty is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administra-
tive penalty or sanction authorized by law.
(9) (6) The division may, at its discretion, block access to certain
controlled substances prescriptions database data if the division has rea-
son to believe that access to the data is or may be used illegally.
(10) (7) All costs associated with recording and submitting data as re-
quired in this section are assumed by the dispensing practitioner recording
and submitting the data.
(11) (8) For purposes of this section, "delegate" means a nurse, medi-
cal or office assistant, current student of a health profession if the health
care staff, current health profession student of a licensed practitioner or
registered graduate of such profession who may access the database, or a reg-
istered pharmacy technician who is designated by a supervising practitioner


or pharmacist to access the database according to the provisions of this sec-
tion and who must register with the division for such access.
SECTION 13. That Section 37-2731, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2731. INFORMATION REQUIRED ON LABEL. A practitioner with statutory
authority to dispense a controlled substance shall affix to the package a la-
bel pursuant to board rule Idaho law.
SECTION 14. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.